District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “General Provisions of the 21st Century Financial Modernization Act of 2000”.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 101, 48 DCR 3244
This section is referenced in § 26-1401.02.